West Virginia, session 2025, HB3335.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. ACTIONS FOR INJURIES. §55-7-9. Violation of statutes. (a) Any person injured by the violation of any statute may recover from the offender such damages as he or she may sustain by reason of the violation, although a penalty or forfeiture for such violation be thereby imposed, unless the same be expressly mentioned to be in lieu of such damages.(b)  Any person involved in an automobile accident, when that person has had his or her operator's license suspended or revoked, shall be considered in violation of §17B-4-3 of this code, and at fault for the accident and responsible to persons for injuries or property damaged.